Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2234
Allocation of aid.

Aid appropriated pursuant to the Community College Aid Act for fiscal year 2013-14 and each fiscal year thereafter shall be allocated among community college areas and tribally controlled community colleges as follows:

(1) The initial $87,870,147 appropriated pursuant to the act shall be allocated to community college areas based on the proportionate share of aid received by each community college area for fiscal year 2012-13. If the amount appropriated for such fiscal year exceeds $87,870,147, the excess amount shall be allocated as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this section. If the amount appropriated for such fiscal year is less than or equal to $87,870,147, the amount appropriated shall be allocated to community college areas based on the proportionate share of aid received by each community college area for fiscal year 2012-13;

(2) Of any amount remaining after the allocation of aid pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section, the next amount, up to but not to exceed $500,000, shall be allocated as state aid pursuant to section 85-1539; and

(3) Any amount remaining after the allocations provided for in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section shall be allocated among the community college areas on the following basis:

(a) Twenty-five percent of such amount shall be divided equally based on the number of community college areas designated pursuant to section 85-1504;

(b) Forty-five percent of such amount shall be divided based on each community college area's proportionate share of three-year average full-time equivalent student enrollment. A community college area's proportionate share of three-year average full-time equivalent student enrollment shall equal the sum of a community college area's full-time equivalent student enrollment total for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year for which aid is being calculated divided by three, with such quotient divided by the quotient resulting from the sum of the full-time equivalent student enrollment total of all community college areas for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year for which aid is being calculated divided by three;

(c) Thirty percent of such amount shall be divided based on each community college area's proportionate share of three-year average reimbursable educational units. A community college area's proportionate share of three-year average reimbursable educational units shall equal the sum of a community college area's reimbursable educational unit total for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year for which aid is being calculated divided by three, with such quotient divided by the quotient resulting from the sum of the reimbursable educational unit total of all community college areas for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year for which aid is being calculated divided by three; and

(d) Tribally controlled community college state aid amounts shall be allocated pursuant to subdivision (24) of section 85-1503 and subdivision (16) of section 85-1511.

Laws 2012, LB946, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB211, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB100, § 2.
The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705(2), has corrected a faulty internal reference to subdivision (24) of section 85-1503 to harmonize with former acts of the Legislature.